Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1035.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state department of corrections; pay increase The sum of $34,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state department of corrections for a salary increase of five percent for sworn correctional officers, civilians employed by the department and employees of private prison contractors that house inmates under contract with the state department of corrections.